Maryland, session 2026, SB0823.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
7–202.
(a) (1) The Commission consists of ten members.
(2) (I) [With the approval of the] THE Governor [and], WITH the advice
and consent of the Senate, [the Secretary] shall appoint the members of the Commission
FROM AMONG NOMINEES CHOSEN BY A PANEL CONSISTING OF:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0823*

SENATE BILL 823
1. THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE MARYLAND
POLICE TRAINING AND STANDARDS COMMISSION;
2. THE SECRETARY OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND
CORRECTIONAL SERVICES;
3. THE PUBLIC DEFENDER OF MARYLAND;
4. THE PRESIDENT OF THE MARYLAND STATE’S
ATTORNEYS’ ASSOCIATION;
5. THREE SERVICE PROVIDERS FROM THE FIELDS OF
MENTAL HEALTH, SUBSTANCE USE TREATMENT, VOCATIONAL AND EDUCATIONAL
TRAINING, OR COMMUNITY ORGANIZING, APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR;
6. THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS;
7. 6. THE PRESIDENT OF THE NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF
SOCIAL WORKERS – MARYLAND CHAPTER, OR THE PRESIDENT’S DESIGNEE;
8. 7. THREE MEMBERS OF THE GENERAL PUBLIC,
APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR;
9. 8. ONE PRISONERS’ RIGHTS ADVOCATE, APPOINTED BY
THE GOVERNOR; AND
10. 9. ONE VICTIMS’ RIGHTS ADVOCATE, APPOINTED BY THE
GOVERNOR.
(II) THE PANEL SHALL SUBMIT TO THE GOVERNOR THE NAMES
OF AT LEAST THREE QUALIFIED NOMINEES FOR EACH COMMISSIONER VACANCY TO
BE FILLED.
(III) THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF CRIME PREVENTION AND
POLICY SHALL PROVIDE STAFFING FOR THE PANEL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.